Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.020

Certification—Tribes. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

A certified tribe must provide certification of RCW 10.32.010(2) (a) and (b), signed by the tribe's judicial officer and chief legal counsel, to the office of the attorney general. The office of the attorney general shall receive the certification documentation indicating that the tribe meets the requirements of the tribal law and order act of 2010 section 234, codified at 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1302, and review the documentation to confirm that it is complete according to the information provided in the documentation. The office of the attorney general shall be immune from liability arising out of the performance of duties under this section, except their intentional or willful misconduct.

[ 2024 c 207 s 3.]